North Dakota statutes. TITLE 11 Counties
CHAPTER 11-37 Commerce Authorities [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 439, § 104]

11-37-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-02.
Purposes of commerce authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 2; 2011, ch. 46, § 10; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-03.
Creation of commerce authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 3; 2011, ch. 46, § 11; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-04.
Filing of agreement and resolutions — Certificate of incorporation — Beginning of corporate existence. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 4; 2011, ch. 46, § 12; repealed by 2015, sb2144, § 104, effective August 1, 2015.

11-37-05.
Commissioners — Compensation — Officers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 5; 2013, ch. 93, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-06.
Powers of political subdivisions in aid of a commerce authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 6; 2011, ch. 46, § 13; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-07.
Powers of commerce authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-08.
Bonds and other obligations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 8; 2009, ch. 545, § 3; 2011, ch. 46, § 14; 2013, ch. 449, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-09.
Operation and use privileges. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 9; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-10.
Sales and use tax incentives. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 10; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-11.
Commerce authority property and income exempt from taxation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 11; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-12.
Out-of-state jurisdiction authorized — Reciprocity with adjoining governmental agencies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 12; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-13.
Tax levy by political subdivision. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 13; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 11-37-13 was amended 2 times and repealed by the 2015 General Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-2-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 11 of Chapter 92, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2217; Section 14 of Chapter 88, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2056 and Section 104 of Chapter 439, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2144.

11-37-14.
Maximum tax levy — County levy not applied in political subdivision making levy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 14; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

11-37-15.
Favorable rates. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 15; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015; repealed by 2015, sb2144, § 104, effective August 1, 2015.